Washington statutes.
RCW 26.52.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Domestic or family violence" includes, but is not limited to, conduct when committed by one family member against another that is classified in the jurisdiction where the conduct occurred as a domestic violence crime or a crime committed in another jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would be classified as domestic violence under RCW 10.99.020.

(2) "Family members" means intimate partners and family or household members as those terms are defined in RCW 7.105.010.

(3) "Foreign protection order" means an injunction or other order related to domestic or family violence, harassment, sexual abuse, or stalking, for the purpose of preventing violent or threatening acts or harassment against, or contact or communication with or physical proximity to another person issued by a court of another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the District of Columbia, or any United States military tribunal, or a tribal court, in a civil or criminal action.

(4) "Harassment" includes, but is not limited to, conduct that is classified in the jurisdiction where the conduct occurred as harassment or a crime committed in another jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would be classified as harassment under RCW 9A.46.040.

(5) "Judicial day" does not include Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays in Washington state.

(6) "Person entitled to protection" means a person, regardless of whether the person was the moving party in the foreign jurisdiction, who is benefited by the foreign protection order.

(7) "Person under restraint" means a person, regardless of whether the person was the responding party in the foreign jurisdiction, whose ability to contact or communicate with another person, or to be physically close to another person, is restricted by the foreign protection order.

(8) "Sexual abuse" includes, but is not limited to, conduct that is classified in the jurisdiction where the conduct occurred as a sex offense or a crime committed in another jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030.

(9) "Stalking" includes, but is not limited to, conduct that is classified in the jurisdiction where the conduct occurred as stalking or a crime committed in another jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would be classified as stalking under RCW 9A.46.110.

(10) "Washington court" includes the superior, district, and municipal courts of the state of Washington.

[ 2021 c 215 s 144; 1999 c 184 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.